Nevada, session 83, AB91.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 213 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board may
grant second look review to a prisoner convicted of a:
(a) Category A felony if the prisoner:
(1) Is not serving a sentence of life imprisonment without
the possibility of parole and has not been sentenced to death;
(2) Does not pose a significant and articulable risk to
public safety; and
(3) Has served not less than 25 years of the minimum term
or minimum aggregate term of imprisonment, as applicable,
imposed by the court; or
(b) Category B felony if the prisoner:
(1) Does not pose a significant and articulable risk to
public safety; and
(2) Has served not less than 15 years of the minimum term
or minimum aggregate term of imprisonment, as applicable,
imposed by the court.
2. Consideration for second look review may be initiated by
the submission of a written application and supporting
documentation to the Board, including, without limitation,
relevant medical records, plans for parole, program participation
records, institutional records and any other relevant documents,
from:
(a) A prison official or employee;
(b) A prisoner;
(c) An attorney or representative of a prisoner;
(d) A family member of a prisoner; or
(e) A medical or mental health professional.
3. Not later than 15 days after receipt of an application
submitted pursuant to subsection 2, the Board shall notify
the Department of the application and request verification of the
length of time the prisoner has spent in the custody of the
Department.
-
*AB91_R1*

– 3 –
4. Upon receipt of a request from the Board submitted
pursuant to subsection 3, if the Department determines that the
prisoner:
(a) Meets the criteria set forth in subsection 1, the Department
shall:
(1) Notify the Board of the prisoner’s eligibility for second
look review;
(2) Place the prisoner on the next available list of persons
eligible for second look review; and
(3) Provide to the Board a report prepared in accordance
with paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 213.131.
(b) Does not meet the criteria set forth in subsection 1, the
Department shall notify the Board and explain the reasons for
such a determination.
5. Upon receipt of the list of persons eligible for second look
review, the Board shall, after sending copies of the list to all law
enforcement agencies in this State and other appropriate persons
in accordance with subsection 5 of NRS 213.1085, schedule a
hearing to conduct the second look review of an eligible prisoner
whose name appears on the list.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Board
shall schedule and conduct the second look review hearing of a
prisoner in the same general manner in which other prisoners are
considered for parole. The Board shall notify the prisoner and, if
applicable, the person who submitted the application pursuant to
subsection 2 of the date, time and location of the second look
review hearing.
7. In determining whether to grant second look review to a
prisoner, the Board may consider:
(a) The written application and supporting documentation
submitted to the Board pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) The age of the prisoner at the time the application was
submitted pursuant to subsection 2 in conjunction with any
relevant research presented at the hearing concerning the impact
of aging on the behavior of a person;
(c) The behavior of the prisoner while in custody, including,
without limitation:
(1) Any disciplinary action taken against the prisoner; and
(2) Whether the prisoner has completed a program of
general education, an industrial or vocational training program or
any other program for rehabilitation or treatment;
(d) Any victim impact statement, other documents or testimony
submitted by the victim;
-
*AB91_R1*

– 4 –
(e) Any evidence indicating that the sentence imposed was
inconsistent with the public policy set forth in NRS 176.0131 or
any state laws, regulations or guidelines relating to sentencing;
(f) Whether a stable plan for the release of the prisoner exists;
(g) Whether the prisoner has support available to him or her
in the community or from his or her family; and
(h) Any other evidence the Board deems relevant for purposes
of determining whether the release of the prisoner would benefit,
or would not be dangerous to, society or the prisoner.
8. Upon making a final decision concerning the second look
review of a prisoner, the Board shall provide written notice to the
prisoner of its decision in accordance with subsection 11 of
NRS 213.131.
9. At the time of the release of a prisoner for whom a second
look review was conducted, the Board shall prescribe the terms
and conditions of his or her release.
10. A person who is released pursuant to this section is under
the supervision of the Division. The Division is responsible for
supervising the person’s compliance with the terms and conditions
of release prescribed by the Board.
11. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Board shall not take any action on an application submitted
pursuant to subsection 2 if the prisoner to whom the application
pertains was previously denied second look review and less than
24 months have elapsed since the most recent denial. The Board
may take action on such an application if a shorter period has
been prescribed by the Board or a request is made by the Director
of the Department.
12. The provisions of this section are not intended to replace
the provisions relating to the general eligibility and consideration
of parole provided in NRS 213.1099 and 213.1215.
13. The Board shall adopt any regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
14. As used in this section:
(a) “Department” means the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Domestic violence” means the commission of any act
described in NRS 33.018.
(c) “Relative” of a person includes:
(1) A spouse, parent, grandparent or stepparent;
(2) A natural born child, stepchild or adopted child;
(3) A grandchild, brother, sister, half brother or half sister;
or
(4) A parent of a spouse.
(d) “Sexual abuse” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.100.
-
*AB91_R1*

– 5 –
(e) “Victim” includes:
(1) A person against whom a crime has been committed;
and
(2) A relative of a person described in subparagraph (1).
Sec. 2. NRS 213.107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.107 As used in NRS 213.107 to 213.157, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Board” means the State Board of Parole Commissioners.
2. “Chief” means the Chief Parole and Probation Officer.
3. “Division” means the Division of Parole and Probation of
the Department of Public Safety.
4. “Residential confinement” means the confinement of a
person convicted of a crime to his or her place of residence under
the terms and conditions established by the Board.
5. “Responsivity factors” means characteristics of a person that
affect his or her ability to respond favorably or unfavorably to any
treatment goals.
6. “Risk and needs assessment” means a validated,
standardized actuarial tool that identifies risk factors that increase
the likelihood of a person reoffending and factors that, when
properly addressed, can reduce the likelihood of a person
reoffending.
7. “Sex offender” means any person who has been or is
convicted of a sexual offense.
8. “Sexual offense” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179D.097.
9. “Standards” means the objective standards for granting or
revoking parole or probation which are adopted by the Board or the
Chief.
Sec. 3. NRS 213.12135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.12135 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or unless a prisoner is
subject to earlier eligibility for parole pursuant to any other
provision of law, a prisoner who was sentenced [as an adult] for an
offense that was committed when he or she was less than [18] 25
years of age is eligible for parole as follows:
(a) For a prisoner who is serving a period of incarceration for
having been convicted of an offense or offenses that did not result in
the death of a victim, after the prisoner has served 15 calendar years
of incarceration, including any time served in a county jail.
(b) For a prisoner who is serving a period of incarceration for
having been convicted of an offense or offenses that resulted in the
death of only one victim, after the prisoner has served 20 calendar
years of incarceration, including any time served in a county jail.
-
*AB91_R1*

– 6 –
2. The provisions of this section do not apply to a prisoner who
is serving a period of incarceration for having been convicted of an
offense or offenses that resulted in the death of two or more victims.
Sec. 4. The amendatory provisions of sections 1 and 3 of this
act apply to an offense committed before, on or after January 1,
2026.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any administrative tasks that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB91_R1*